Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.010

Authority for use.

At any primary or election in any county, votes may be cast, registered, recorded, or counted by means of voting systems that have been approved under RCW 29A.12.020.

[ 2003 c 111 s 301. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 17; 1967 ex.s. c 109 s 12; 1965 c 9 s 29.33.020; prior: (i) 1913 c 58 s 1, part; RRS s 5300, part. (ii) 1913 c 58 s 18; RRS s 5318. Formerly RCW 29.33.020.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.